Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,109
Employees; information; furnish; refusal; effect.

When any employee is injured in any accident or suffers any occupational disease arising out of or in the course of his or her employment, such employee as soon as practicable shall report full information on such occurrence to the head of the agency by which he or she is employed. The head of the agency shall furnish immediately all available information on such occurrence to the Risk Manager. All employees shall cooperate fully with the Attorney General in the investigation of all workers' compensation claims. Failure to comply with this section shall constitute grounds for dismissal from employment.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 18;

Laws 1972, LB 1334, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 135.